ko: 지원되는 치료 모드: APAP; APAP (여성용); 자동 CPAP; 이중압력; CPAP; EPAP; 기타
sk-SK: Podporovaný terapeutický režim: APAP; APAP (pre ňu); Auto CPAP; Dvojúrovňový; CPAP; EPAP; Iné
pt-BR: Modo de terapia suportado: APAP; APAP (para mulheres); CPAP automático; Binível; CPAP; EPAP; Outro
hr-HR: Podržani način terapije: APAP; APAP (za nju); Auto CPAP; Bilevel; CPAP; EPAP; Ostalo
fr: Modes de thérapie pris en charge: APAP; APAP (pour elle); CPAP automatique; Biniveau; CPAP; EPAP; Autre
en: Therapy mode supported: APAP; APAP (For Her); Auto CPAP; Bilevel; CPAP; EPAP; Other
hu: Támogatott terápiás mód: APAP; APAP (nők számára); Auto CPAP; Kétszintes; CPAP; EPAP; Egyéb
zh-CN: 支持的治疗模式: 自动正压通气; 女性自动正压通气; 自动持续正压通气; 双水平; 持续正压通气; 呼气正压通气; 其他
bg-BG: Поддържан терапевтичен режим: APAP; APAP (за нея); Автоматичен CPAP; Двустепенен; CPAP; EPAP; Други
nb: Terapimodus støttet: APAP; APAP (For henne); Auto CPAP; Bilevel; CPAP; EPAP; Annet
pt-PT: Algoritmos de terapia suportados: APAP; APAP (para ela); CPAP automático; Binível; CPAP; EPAP; Outro
nl: Ondersteunde therapiemodus: APAP; APAP (voor haar); Auto CPAP; Bilevel; CPAP; EPAP; Andere
ru: Поддерживаемый режим терапии: АПАП; АПАП (для женщин); Авто СИПАП; Двухуровневый; СИПАП; ЭПАП; Другой
tr: Desteklenen terapi modları: APAP; APAP (kadınlar için); Otomatik CPAP; Çift seviyeli; CPAP; EPAP; Diğer
fi: Tuettu hoitomuoto: APAP; APAP (naisille); Automaattinen CPAP; Kaksoispainetila; CPAP; EPAP; Muu
th: โหมดการรักษาที่รองรับ: เอแพพ; เอแพพ (สำหรับผู้หญิง); ออโต้ ซีแพพ; ไบเลเวล; ซีแพพ; อีแพพ; อื่นๆ
el: Υποστηριζόμενη λειτουργία θεραπείας: APAP; APAP (για εκείνη); Αυτόματο CPAP; Διπλού επιπέδου; CPAP; EPAP; Άλλο
cs: Podporovaný terapeutický režim: APAP; APAP (pro ženy); Automatický CPAP; Dvouúrovňový; CPAP; EPAP; Jiné
sv: Stödda terapilägen: APAP; APAP (för henne); Auto CPAP; Tvånivå; CPAP; EPAP; Övrigt
it: Modalità di terapia supportata: APAP; APAP (per lei); CPAP automatico; Bilivello; CPAP; EPAP; Altro
pl: Obsługiwany tryb terapii: APAP; APAP (dla niej); Auto CPAP; Dwupoziomowe; CPAP; EPAP; Inne
es: Modo de terapia soportado: APAP; APAP (para ella); CPAP automático; Binivel; CPAP; EPAP; Otros
ja: サポートされる治療モード: APAP; APAP（女性用）; オートCPAP; バイレベル; CPAP; EPAP; その他
ro-RO: Mod de terapie acceptat: APAP; APAP (pentru ea); CPAP automat; Binivel; CPAP; EPAP; Altele
da: Understøttet terapitilstand: APAP; APAP (til hende); Auto CPAP; To-niveau; CPAP; EPAP; Andet
vi: Chế độ trị liệu được hỗ trợ: APAP; APAP (Dành cho nữ); CPAP tự động; Hai mức áp; CPAP; EPAP; Khác
sl-SI: Podprti način terapije: APAP; APAP (za njo); Avtomatski CPAP; Dvonivojski; CPAP; EPAP; Drugo
zh-TW: 支援的治療模式: 自動正壓呼吸器; 女性專用自動正壓呼吸器; 自動持續正壓呼吸器; 雙氣壓; 持續正壓呼吸器; 呼氣正壓; 其他
de: Unterstützter Therapiemodus: APAP; APAP (für sie); Auto-CPAP; Bilevel; CPAP; EPAP; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Palaikomas terapijos režimas: APAP; APAP (moterims); Automatinis CPAP; Dviejų lygių; CPAP; EPAP; Kita